District of Columbia statutes.
31-3408.01

Compliance with other laws.

Health maintenance organizations shall comply with the following laws:

(1)

Chapter 3 of this title;

(2)

Chapter 19 of this title;

(3)

Chapter 14 of this title;

(4)

Subchapter I of Chapter 7 of this title;

(5)

Chapter 21 of this title; and

(6)

The Reasonable Health Insurance Ratemaking Reform Act of 2010 [Chapters 30A, 31C, and 33A of this title].

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 9a
as added Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-252, § 2(d), 50 DCR 225
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 502(a), 58 DCR 896
Application of Law 14-252: Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-252 provided: “This act shall not apply until the Commissioner gives written notice that all necessary rules and administrative procedures are in place to effect the provisions of this act.”
D.C. Law 18-360 deleted “and” from the end of par. (4), substituted “; and” for a period the end of par. (5), and added par. (6).